Maryland, session 2026, HB1567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1207.
(a) (1) If a bicycle or a motor scooter is used on a highway at any time when,
due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons and vehicles on the
highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of 1,000 feet, the bicycle or motor scooter
shall be equipped:
(i) On the front, with a lamp that emits a white light visible from a
distance of at least 500 feet to the front; and
(ii) On the rear, with a red reflector of a type approved by the
Administration and visible from all distances from 600 feet to 100 feet to the rear when
directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle.
(2) A bicycle or bicyclist may be equipped with a functioning lamp that acts
as a reflector and emits a red light or a flashing amber light visible from a distance of 500
feet to the rear instead of or in addition to the red reflector required by paragraph (1) of
this subsection.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a person may operate a bicycle [or], a
motor scooter, OR AN EPAMD that is equipped with a bell, HORN, or other device capable
of giving a signal audible for a distance of at least 100 feet.
(c) A bicycle [or], A motor scooter, OR AN EPAMD may not be equipped with nor
may any person use on a bicycle, A MOTOR SCOOTER, OR AN EPAMD any siren or
whistle.
(d) Every bicycle and motor scooter shall be equipped with a braking system
capable of stopping from a speed of 10 miles per hour within 15 feet on dry, level, clean
pavement.
21–1209.1.
(A) A PERSON OPERATING A BICYCLE, A MOTOR SCOOTER, OR AN EPAMD
SHALL:
(1) EXERCISE DUE CARE TO AVOID COLLIDING WITH A VEHICLE OR
PEDESTRIAN; AND

HOUSE BILL 1567 3
(2) WHEN OVERTAKING AND PASSING A VEHICLE OR PEDESTRIAN, IF
PRACTICABLE, PASS SAFELY AT A DISTANCE OF NOT LESS THAN 3 FEET.
(B) AN OPERATOR OF A BICYCLE, A MOTOR SCOOTER, OR AN EPAMD
SHALL GIVE AN AUDIBLE WARNING BY VOICE OR BELL, HORN, OR OTHER DEVICE
BEFORE OVERTAKING AND PASSING A PEDESTRIAN.
(C) (B) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A
SECONDARY ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A PERSON OPERATING A
BICYCLE, A MOTOR SCOOTER, OR AN EPAMD FOR A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF
ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
(2) A PERSON WHO IS FOUND LIABLE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF $25.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.